fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-nîskwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nîskwa / -îskw- - ok : # -m animate dependent husband's ex AEW NDA4w
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîskwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîskwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîskonâna
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kîskonawa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîskowâwa

     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nîskwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kîskwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nîskonâna
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kîskonawa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kîskowâwa

     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîskwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: wîskowâwa
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: wîskoyiwa


     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîskwak
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîskwak
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîskonânak
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kîskonawak
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîskowâwak


     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nîskos,     nîskosis]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kîskos,     kîskosis]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nîskosinân, nîskosisinân]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kîskosinaw, kîskosisinaw]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kîskosiwâw, kîskosisiwâw]

     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [wîskosa,     wîskosisa]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [wîskosiwâwa, wîskosisiwâwa]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [wîskosiyiwa, wîskosisiyiwa]

     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nîskosak,     nîskosisak]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kîskosak,     kîskosisak]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nîskosinânak, nîskosisinânak]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kîskosinawak, kîskosisinawak]
     nîskwa+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kîskosiwâwak, kîskosisiwâwak]
